Utah statutes.
58-31b-303.   Qualifications for licensure -- Graduates of nonapproved
nursing programs.
An applicant for licensure as a practical nurse or registered nurse who is a
graduate of a nursing education program not approved by the division in
collaboration with the board must comply with the requirements of this
section.
(1)  An applicant for licensure as a licensed practical nurse shall:
(a)  meet all requirements of Subsection 58-31b-302(2), except Subsection
(2)(e); and
(b)  produce evidence acceptable to the division and the board that the
nursing education program completed by the applicant is equivalent to the
minimum standards established by the division in collaboration with the board
for an approved licensed practical nursing education program.
(2)  An applicant for licensure as a registered nurse shall:
(a)  meet all requirements of Subsection 58-31b-302 (3), except Subsection
(3)(e); and
(b) (i)  pass the Commission on Graduates of Foreign Nursing Schools (CGFNS)
Examination; or
(ii)  produce evidence acceptable to the division and the board that the
applicant is currently licensed as a registered nurse in one of the states,
territories, or the District of Columbia of the United States and has passed
the NCLEX-RN examination.
